District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-933

Conflict of interest.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 8, 33 DCR 7188
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2507.